apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="premf__prn">
      <e><p><l>mi<b/>mem</l>        <r>mi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi<b/>mem</l>        <r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ci<b/>mem</l> <r>ci<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vi<b/>mem</l> <r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vi<b/>mem</l> <r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li<b/>mem</l>        <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ŝi<b/>mem</l>        <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ĝi<b/>mem</l>        <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni<b/>mem</l>        <r>ni<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ili<b/>mem</l>       <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ili<b/>mem</l><r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ili<b/>mem</l><r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si<b/>mem</l>        <r>si<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>min<b/>mem</l>       <r>mi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vin<b/>mem</l>       <r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>cin<b/>mem</l><r>ci<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vin<b/>mem</l><r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vin<b/>mem</l><r>vi<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lin<b/>mem</l>       <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ŝin<b/>mem</l>       <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ĝin<b/>mem</l>       <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nin<b/>mem</l>       <r>ni<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ilin<b/>mem</l>      <r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ilin<b/>mem</l><r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ilin<b/>mem</l><r>li<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sin<b/>mem</l>       <r>si<b/>mem<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e><p><l>min</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vin</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>cin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lin</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>lin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ŝin</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ĝin</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ĝin</l>       <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nin</l>              <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ilin</l>             <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ilin</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ilin</l>      <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onin</l>             <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prdat__prn">
      <e><p><l>al<b/>mi</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>vi</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>al<b/>ci</l>  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>al<b/>vi</l>  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>al<b/>vi</l>  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>li</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>al<b/>li</l>  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>ŝi</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>ĝi</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>ni</l>         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al<b/>ili</l>        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>al<b/>ili</l> <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>al<b/>ili</l> <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>al<b/>oni</l> <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e><re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e><re>[a-z0-9._\-]+@[a-z0-9._\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="personaj pronomoj de nerekta objekto"><i></i><par n="prdat__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="personaj pronomoj de rekta objekto"><i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="personaj pronomoj emfazaj">      <i></i><par n="premf__prn"/></e>
    <e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="urls"/></e>
